Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2815
Sales and use tax proceeds; use.

The proceeds of the sales and use tax imposed by a municipal county under section 13-2813 shall be distributed to the municipal county for deposit in its general fund.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 15.